test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k52_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: primus
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: primus
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: primusi
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: primus
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: primusar
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: primusar
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: primusum
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: primusa
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: primusin
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: primusin
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: primusinum
    primus+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: primusins
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: primusarnir
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: primusarnar
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: primusunum
    primus+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: primusanna
